Maryland, session 2025, HB0059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
14–811.
(a) (2) The governing body of a county or municipal corporation may withhold
from sale owner–occupied residential property OR RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY OCCUPIED
BY AN HEIR OF A DECEASED OWNER that meets objective criteria established by the
governing body of the county or municipal corporation.
(b) (1) The collector may withhold from sale any NON–OWNER–OCCUPIED
residential property, when the total taxes on the property, including interest and penalties,
amount to less than $750.
(2) [In Baltimore City, the] THE collector shall withhold from sale
owner–occupied residential property, when WHEN the total taxes on the property,
including interest and penalties, amount to less than [$750] $1,000, THE COLLECTOR
SHALL WITHHOLD FROM SALE:
(I) OWNER–OCCUPIED RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY; AND
(II) RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY OCCUPIED BY AN HEIR OF A
DECEASED OWNER.
(3) [In Baltimore City, the] THE collector shall withhold from sale
residential property or property that is exempt from taxation under § 7–204(1) or (2) of this
article, if the taxes on the property consist only of a lien for unpaid charges for water and
sewer service.
(e) [Baltimore City] THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY
OR THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION may withhold
from sale property that has been designated for redevelopment purposes if the property
meets objective criteria established by the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City OR
THE GOVERNING BODY.
(h) (1) In this subsection, “dwelling” and “homeowner” have the meanings
stated in § 9–105 of this article.
(2) The MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
governing body of a county or municipal corporation may withhold from sale a dwelling
owned by a homeowner OR OCCUPIED BY AN HEIR OF A DECEASED HOMEOWNER who is

HOUSE BILL 59
low–income, at least 65 years old, or disabled if the homeowner OR HEIR meets eligibility
criteria established by the county or municipal corporation.
(J) (1) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY SHALL ESTABLISH A REGISTRY FOR INTERESTED
PARTIES OR THE TAX SALE OMBUDSMAN TO DESIGNATE A PROPERTY TO BE
WITHHELD FROM TAX SALE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(2) ON REQUEST OF THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE
CITY OR THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE
ASSISTANCE IN CREATING AND MAINTAINING THE REGISTRY REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
14–817.
(c) (1) Abandoned property consisting of either a vacant lot or improved
property cited as vacant and unfit for habitation on a housing or building violation notice
may be sold for a sum less than the total amount of:
(i) all taxes on the property that are certified to the collector under
§ 14–810 of this subtitle;
(ii) interest and penalties on the taxes; and
(iii) expenses incurred in making the sale.
(2) The collector shall establish a minimum bid for abandoned property
sold under this subsection.
(3) The person responsible for the taxes prior to the sale shall remain liable
to the collector for the difference between the amount received in the tax sale under this
section and the taxes, interest, penalties, and expenses remaining after the sale.
(4) The balance remaining after the tax sale shall be included in the
amount necessary to redeem the property under § 14–828 of this subtitle.
(5) In a proceeding brought by the governing body of a county or municipal
corporation to foreclose the right of redemption under this subtitle, the complaint may
request a judgment for the county or municipal corporation in the amount of the balance.
(6) The balance remaining after the tax sale is no longer a lien on the
property when:
(i) a judgment is entered foreclosing the owner’s right of
redemption;

HOUSE BILL 59 5
(ii) the deed is recorded; and
(iii) all liens accruing subsequent to the date of sale are paid in full.
(7) The governing body of a county or municipal corporation may institute
a separate action to collect the balance at any time within 7 years after the tax sale if the
plaintiff is a private purchaser.
14–817.1.
(a) Within 60 days after a property is sold at a tax sale, the collector shall send to
the person who last appears as owner of the property on the collector’s tax roll, at the last
address shown on the tax roll, a notice that includes:
(1) a statement that the property has been sold to satisfy unpaid taxes;
(2) the date of the tax sale;
(3) the amount of the highest bid;
(4) the lien amount on the property at the time of sale;
(5) a statement that the owner has the right to redeem the property until
a court forecloses that right;
(6) a statement that the purchaser of the property may institute an action
to foreclose the property:
(i) as early as 6 months from the date of the sale; or
(ii) if a government agency certifies that the property requires, or
shall require, substantial repair to comply with applicable business codes, as early as 60
days from the date of the sale;
(7) a statement that if the property is redeemed before an action to
foreclose the right of redemption is filed, the amount that shall be paid to redeem the
property is:
(i) the total lien amount on the property at the time of sale, with
interest;
(ii) any taxes, interest, and penalties paid by the holder of the
certificate of sale; and
(iii) FOR PROPERTY THAT IS NOT OWNER–OCCUPIED
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY, any DELINQUENT taxes, interest, and penalties accruing after
the date of the tax sale;

HOUSE BILL 59
(8) a statement that, if the property is redeemed more than 4 months after
the date of the tax sale, and before an action to foreclose the right of redemption is filed,
the holder of the certificate of sale may be reimbursed for:
(i) attorney’s fees for recording the certificate of sale;
(ii) a title search fee, not to exceed $250; and
(iii) reasonable attorney’s fees, not to exceed $500;
(9) a statement that, if the property is redeemed after an action to foreclose
the right of redemption has been filed, the amount that shall be paid to redeem the property
is the sum of:
(i) the total lien amount on the property at the time of sale, with
interest;
(ii) any taxes, interest, and penalties paid by the holder of the
certificate of sale;
(iii) FOR PROPERTY THAT IS NOT OWNER–OCCUPIED
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY, any DELINQUENT taxes, interest, and penalties accruing after
the date of the tax sale; and
(iv) attorney’s fees and expenses to which the holder of the certificate
of sale may be entitled under § 14–843(a)(4) and (5) of this subtitle; and
(10) the provisions of § 14–843(a) of this subtitle, reproduced as they appear
in the Code.
14–820.
(a) The collector shall deliver to the purchaser a certificate of sale under the
collector’s hand and seal, or by the collector’s authorized facsimile signature, acknowledged
by the collector as a conveyance of land, which certificate shall set forth:
(1) that the property described in it was sold by the collector to the
purchaser;
(2) the date of the sale;
(3) the amount for which the property was sold;
(4) the total amount of taxes due on the property at the time of sale
together with interest, penalties and expenses incurred in making the sale;

HOUSE BILL 59 7
(5) a description of the property in substantially the same form as the
description appearing on the collector’s tax roll. If the property is unimproved or has no
street number, and the collector has procured a description of the property from the county
or municipal corporation surveyor, this description shall be included in the certificate of
sale. In Garrett County a copy of the description as required by § 14–813(f) of this subtitle,
as that section relates specifically to Garrett County, shall be included in the certificate of
sale;
(6) a statement that the rate of redemption is 6% a year, except as provided
in subsection (b) of this section;
(7) the time when an action to foreclose the right of redemption may be
instituted; and
(8) (i) that the certificate will be void unless foreclosure proceedings are
brought within 2 years from the date of the certificate; or
(ii) that, unless foreclosure proceedings are brought within 3 months
from the date of the certificate to any abandoned property [in Baltimore City] sold under §
14–817(c)(1) of this subtitle with a minimum bid less than the lien amount, the certificate:
1. is void as to a private purchaser; and
2. reverts to the Mayor and City Council OF BALTIMORE
CITY OR THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY, OR IF THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED IN
A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION for a period of 2 years from the date of the tax sale.
(b) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE rate of
redemption is 6% a year except:
(1) in Allegany County the rate is 6% a year or as fixed by the County
Commissioners;
(2) in Anne Arundel County the rate is 6% a year or as fixed by a law of the
County Council;
(3) in Baltimore City the rate is 6% a year or as fixed by a law of the City
Council;
(4) in Baltimore County the rate is 6% a year or as fixed by a law of the
County Council;
(5) in Cecil County the rate is 6% a year or as fixed by the County
Commissioners;

HOUSE BILL 59
(6) in Calvert County the rate is 10% a year or as fixed by the County
Commissioners;
(7) in Caroline County the rate is 10% a year or as fixed by the County
Commissioners;
(8) in Carroll County the rate is 14% a year or as fixed by the County
Commissioners;
(9) in Dorchester County the rate is 10% a year or as fixed by the County
Commissioners;
(10) in Frederick County the rate is 6% a year or as fixed by the governing
body of Frederick County;
(11) in Garrett County the rate is 10% a year or as fixed by the County
Commissioners;
(12) in Harford County the rate is 6% a year or as fixed by a law of the
County Council;
(13) in Howard County the rate is 6% a year or as fixed by a law of the
County Council;
(14) in Kent County the rate is 6% a year or as fixed by the County
Commissioners;
(15) in Montgomery County the rate is 6% a year or as fixed by a law of the
County Council;
(16) in Prince George’s County the rate is 6% a year or as fixed by a law of
the County Council;
(17) in Queen Anne’s County the rate is 6% a year or as fixed by the County
Commissioners;
(18) in Somerset County, Charles County, Wicomico County, and Worcester
County the rate is 6% a year or as fixed by the County Commissioners or by a law of the
County Council;
(19) in Talbot County the rate is 6% a year or as fixed by a law of the County
Council; and
(20) in Washington County the rate is 6% a year or as fixed by the County
Commissioners.

HOUSE BILL 59 9
(C) FOR OWNER–OCCUPIED RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY, THE RATE OF
REDEMPTION MAY NOT EXCEED 10% A YEAR.
[(c)] (D) The certificate of sale shall be in substantially the following form:
“I, .........., Collector of Taxes for the State of Maryland and the .......... of ........, certify that
on ......., 20...., I sold to ........, at public auction for the sum of .......... Dollars and ......... Cents,
of which ...... Dollars has been paid, the property in ......... described as ........ and assessed
to ......... The property described in this certificate is subject to redemption. On redemption
the holder of the certificate will be refunded the sums paid on account of the purchase price
together with interest at the rate of 6% a year from the date of payment to the date of
redemption (except as stated in [subsection (b) of] § 14–820 of the Tax – Property Article
of the Annotated Code of Maryland), together with all other amounts specified by Chapter
761 of the Acts of 1943, and acts that amend that chapter. The balance due on account of
the purchase price and all taxes, together with interest and penalties on the taxes, accruing
after the date of sale, must be paid to the Collector before a deed can be delivered to the
purchaser. After .........., 20...., a proceeding can be brought to foreclose all rights of
redemption in the property. This certificate will be void unless such a proceeding is brought
within 2 years from the date of this certificate, except that [in Baltimore City,] with respect
to any abandoned property sold under § 14–817(c) of the Tax – Property Article of the
Annotated Code of Maryland with a minimum bid less than the lien amount, the certificate
will revert to the Mayor and City Council OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE GOVERNING
BODY OF THE COUNTY, OR IF THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED IN A MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION, THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, and will
be void as to the private purchaser at tax sale unless such a proceeding is brought within 3
months from the date of the certificate.
Witness my hand and seal, this ....... day of ......, 20...............
...............................
Collector”
(To be followed by acknowledgment).
14–828.
(a) (1) If the property is redeemed, the person redeeming shall pay the
collector:
(i) the total lien amount paid at the tax sale for the property
together with interest;
(ii) any taxes, interest, and penalties paid by any holder of the
certificate of sale;
(iii) except as provided under paragraph (2) of this subsection, any
delinquent taxes, interest, and penalties accruing after the date of the tax sale;

HOUSE BILL 59
(iv) in the manner and by the terms required by the collector, any
expenses or fees for which the plaintiff or the holder of a certificate of sale is entitled to
reimbursement under § 14–843 of this subtitle; and
(v) for vacant and abandoned property sold under § 14–817 of this
subtitle for a sum less than the amount due, the difference between the price paid and the
unpaid taxes, interest, penalties, and expenses.
(2) For owner–occupied residential property [in Baltimore City], any taxes,
interest, and penalties accruing after the date of the tax sale may not be included in the
redemption payment required under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
14–833.
(a) (2) Except as provided in subsections (a–1), (e), (f), and (g) of this section,
at any time after [9] 12 months from the date of sale of owner–occupied residential
property, a holder of any certificate of sale may file a complaint to foreclose all rights of
redemption of the property to which the certificate relates.
(a–1) (3) The notices required under this subsection shall include at least the
following:
(v) a statement that if the property is redeemed before an action to
foreclose the right of redemption is filed, the amount that shall be paid to redeem the
property is:
3. FOR PROPERTY THAT IS NOT OWNER–OCCUPIED
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY, any delinquent taxes, interest, and penalties accruing after the
date of the tax sale; and
(vi) a statement that if the property is redeemed after an action to
foreclose the right of redemption has been filed, the amount that shall be paid to redeem
the property is the sum of:
3. FOR PROPERTY THAT IS NOT OWNER–OCCUPIED
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY, any delinquent taxes, interest, and penalties accruing after the
date of the tax sale; and
(4) (i) 2. For owner–occupied residential property, the first of the
two notices required under this subsection may not be sent until [7] 10 months after the
date of sale.
(c) (2) A certificate for abandoned property sold under § 14–817(c) of this
subtitle with a minimum bid less than the lien amount reverts to the MAYOR AND CITY
COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE county or, IF THE

HOUSE BILL 59 11
PROPERTY IS LOCATED IN A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, THE GOVERNING BODY OF
THE municipal corporation and is void as to the private purchaser at tax sale unless:
(i) a proceeding to foreclose the right of redemption is filed within 3
months of the date of the certificate of sale; and
(ii) unless the holder is granted an extension by the court due to a
showing of extraordinary circumstances beyond the certificate holder’s control, the holder
secures a decree from the circuit court in which the foreclosure proceeding was filed within
18 months from the date of the filing of the foreclosure proceeding.
(d) (2) If a certificate for abandoned property reverts to the Mayor and City
Council of Baltimore City OR THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR, IF THE
PROPERTY IS LOCATED IN A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, THE GOVERNING BODY OF
THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION under this section, the Mayor and City Council OR THE
GOVERNING BODY may:
(i) file a foreclosure proceeding in its own name; or
(ii) 1. resell the certificate; and
2. apply all money received on account of the sale to any
outstanding balance remaining after the sale on the tax debt owed by the previous owner
of the abandoned property.
14–836.
(b) (4) (i) Notwithstanding the provision of paragraph (3) of this
subsection, the plaintiff shall send written notice of the proceeding to:
1. all persons having a recorded interest, claim, or lien,
including a judgment, who have not been made a defendant in the proceeding, and, if the
subject property is part of a homeowners association or condominium association, to the
homeowners association or condominium association governing the property, at the last
reasonably ascertainable address; [and]
2. each tenant of the subject property whose identity is
known to the plaintiff, at the tenant’s last reasonably ascertainable address; AND
3. IF THE SUBJECT PROPERTY IS OWNER–OCCUPIED,
THE STATE TAX SALE OMBUDSMAN.
(7) (i) Subject to subparagraphs (ii) and (iii) of this paragraph, after
issuance of the judgment foreclosing right of redemption and at least [30] 90 days before
taking possession of the property, the plaintiff shall give any tenant of the property written

HOUSE BILL 59
notice of the plaintiff’s intention to obtain possession of the property and that the tenant
must vacate the property within [30] 90 days after the notice.
(ii) During the [30–day] 90–DAY period immediately following
issuance of the judgment foreclosing the right of redemption, the plaintiff may apply for,
process, and obtain, but not execute upon, a writ for possession of the property.
(iii) The notice shall be sent:
1. by first–class mail, postage prepaid, CERTIFICATE OF
MAILING, bearing a postmark from the United States Postal Service addressed to the
tenant by name if the identity of the tenant is known to the plaintiff, and addressed to
“occupant” if the identity of the tenant is not known;
2. to each separately leased area of the property that the
plaintiff can reasonably ascertain is occupied; and
3. in an envelope prominently marked on the outside with
the following phrase “Notice of Taking Possession of Property”.
(IV) THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL
ALSO BE POSTED ON THE PROPERTY WITHIN 1 DAY 10 5 DAYS OF FIRST BEING SENT
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
14–843.
(a) (4) (ii) For owner–occupied residential property, if an action to foreclose
the right of redemption has not been filed, and the property is redeemed more than [7] 10
months after the date of the tax sale, the holder of a certificate of sale may be reimbursed
for the following expenses actually incurred:
1. costs for recording the certificate of sale;
2. a title search fee, not to exceed $250;
3. the postage and certified mailing costs for the notices
required under § 14–833(a–1) of this subtitle; and
4. reasonable attorney’s fees, not to exceed $500.
(b) (1) (ii) For owner–occupied residential property, the plaintiff or holder
of a certificate of sale may not be reimbursed for expenses incurred within [7] 10 months
after the date of sale.
14–844.

HOUSE BILL 59 13
(e) [In Baltimore City where] WHERE abandoned property has been sold for a
sum less than the amount due under § 14–817 of this subtitle, in a foreclosure proceeding
brought by the Mayor and City Council OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE GOVERNING BODY
OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, the final order may include a judgment in
favor of the city, COUNTY, OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION and against the person liable
for taxes prior to the sale, in the amount of the unpaid taxes, interest, penalties, and
expenses otherwise due in a tax sale.
14–845.
(c) [In Baltimore City, with] WITH respect to abandoned property that is subject
to § 14–817(c) of this subtitle:
(1) a defendant or any person described in § 14–836(b)(1) or (4)(i) of this
subtitle may file an action to recover damages on the ground of inadequate notice within 3
years after the date of judgment foreclosing rights of redemption;
(2) damages in an action under item (1) of this subsection may not exceed
the fair market value of that person’s interest in the property at the time of the sale; and
(3) a person may not file to reopen a judgment foreclosing rights of
redemption based on inadequate notice.
14–849.1.
(a) [In Baltimore City, the Mayor and City Council] THE MAYOR AND CITY
COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION may not sell a property to enforce a lien for unpaid charges
for water and sewer service unless:
(1) the lien is for at least $350;
(2) the property is not:
(i) a residential property; or
(ii) real property that is exempt from taxation under § 7–204(1) or
(2) of this article; and
(3) the unpaid charges for water and sewer service are at least 3 quarters
in arrears.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Mayor and City Council OF
BALTIMORE CITY OR THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION may enforce a lien on a property other than residential property or real

HOUSE BILL 59
property that is exempt from taxation under § 7–204(1) or (2) of this article for unpaid water
and sewer service that is less than $350 if the property is being sold to enforce another lien.
(c) This section does not affect any other right or remedy of Baltimore City, A
COUNTY, OR A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION for the collection of a water and sewer service
charge.
14–879.
(a) (1) The Department shall conduct an annual survey of each county that
conducts a tax sale under Part III of this subtitle to obtain the information specified in this
section.
(2) Each county shall provide the Department all the information specified
in this section on the form that the Department provides.
(3) The Department may not disburse or authorize the disbursement of any
funds to a county under this article if the county has not provided all the information
specified in this section.
(4) EACH COUNTY SHALL MAINTAIN A RECORD OF THE INFORMATION
SPECIFIED IN THIS SECTION FOR AT LEAST 3 YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF A TAX SALE.
14–883.
(a) In this part the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Homeowner” [has the meaning stated] MEANS:
(1) A HOMEOWNER AS DEFINED in § 9–105 of this article; OR
(2) IF A HOMEOWNER AS DEFINED IN § 9–105 OF THIS ARTICLE IS
DECEASED:
(I) THE ESTATE OF THE HOMEOWNER;
(II) THE PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE OF THE HOMEOWNER; OR
(III) AN HEIR OR LEGATEE OF THE HOMEOWNER WHO IS
ENTITLED TO INHERIT THE HOMEOWNER’S DWELLING.
14–884.
(a) There is a Homeowner Protection Program administered by the Ombudsman
in the Department.

HOUSE BILL 59 15
(b) The purpose of the Program is to divert vulnerable homeowners from the
private tax lien sale process under Part III of this subtitle into an alternative program with
the primary purpose of:
(1) minimizing tax collection costs to homeowners;
(2) assisting homeowners to pay their taxes; and
(3) allowing homeowners to remain in their homes.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any tax sale certificate issued before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.